Hawaii statutes.
§481M-15 Reinstatement of agreement and
repossession. (a) A lessee who breaches any lease-purchase agreement,
including but not limited to the failure to make timely lease payments, shall
have the right to reinstate the original lease-purchase agreement without
losing any rights or options previously acquired under the lease-purchase
agreement if both of the following apply:

(1) Subsequent to having failed to make a timely
lease payment, the lessee has promptly surrendered the property to the lessor,
in the manner as set forth in the lease-purchase agreement, and if and when
requested by lessor; and

(2) Not more than thirty days have passed since the
lessee returned the property; provided that if the lessee has made more than
sixty per cent of the total number of payments required under the
lease-purchase agreement to acquire ownership, the thirty-day period shall be
extended to a sixty-day period.

(b) As a condition precedent to reinstatement
of the lease-purchase agreement, a lessor may collect a reinstatement fee as
set forth in subsection (d).

(c) If reinstatement occurs pursuant to this
section, the lessor shall provide the lessee with either the same item leased
by the lessee prior to reinstatement or a substitute item of equivalent quality
and condition. If a substitute item is provided, the lessor shall provide the
lessee with all the information required by section 481M-14.

(d) A reinstatement fee as provided for in
this section shall equal the outstanding balance of any accrued missed payments
and late charges plus an additional fee not to exceed $5. [L 1997, c 248, pt of
§1; am L 2008, c 19, §35]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next